src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON EVEN_ESS
 +Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;


! Old, not used, retained at the moment to remember the history:
!LEXICON I-CLASS ! Links from propernoun (revise?)
!  :%>i   IJ-CASE ; ! others have -ine etc.
!                I-EVEN ;
!                I-ODD ;
!
!LEXICON I-EVEN
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste
!
!LEXICON I-ODD
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste



! Special for cns-final names, due to nomsg
! =========================================

! LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG !(still) not in use
!  NOMSG ;
!  OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
!  OBLIQUE_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG !(still) not in use
! NOMSG ;
! OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
! OBLIQUE_EVEN ;


! LEXICON NOMSG !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Nom:           FINAL1 ;
!
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_COMMON !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
!
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_ODD !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>snie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>stie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>nie    FINAL1 ;

! LEXICON OBLIQUE_EVEN !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>ne     FINAL1 ;

! ---- Nominal derivation sublexica ----

LEXICON GIERIEHTSADTJE
       +Sg:     NIEJTE_SG ;
       +Pl:     NIEJTE_PL ;
                EVEN_ESS  ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e    R         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R         ;

LEXICON GÅATETJE
       +Sg:            N_ODD_SG  ;
       +Pl:            N_ODD_PL  ;
                       N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e           R         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n        R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi R         ;

LEXICON GÅATETJEadj
+Sg+Err/Orth: N_ODD_SG_Px ; 
               +Sg+Nom:e%^DISIMP       FINAL1    ;
               +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm    FINAL1    ;
               +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn    FINAL1    ;
               +Sg+Ill:%>asse          FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
               +Sg+Ine:%>isnie         FINAL1    ;
               +Sg+Ela:%>istie         FINAL1    ;
       +Sg+Ela+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPistie FINAL1    ; !Miesie Mavve
               +Sg+Com:%>inie          FINAL1    ;
                   +Pl:                N_ODD_PL  ;
                                       N_ODD_ESS ;
             +Cmp/SgNom:e               R         ;
             +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n            R         ;
             +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi     R         ;

LEXICON NomActOdd
       +Sg:             N_ODD_SG  ;
       +Pl:             N_ODD_PL  ;
                        N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP    R         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;

LEXICON NomActEven
             +Sg:          N_IE_SG  ;
             +Pl:          N_IE_PL  ;
                           N_IE_ESS ;
       +Cmp/SgNom:ie        R        ;
       +Cmp/SgGen:ie%>n     R        ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+NoUml:ie%>j     R        ;
   +Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi R        ;

LEXICON LDAHKE
         +Cmp/SgNom:e     R         ;
               +Sg:      NIEJTE_SG ;
               +Pl:      NIEJTE_PL ;
                         EVEN_ESS  ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE  ;
 
 
!LEXICON EDH_DAHKE
!       EDH_DAHKE_INFL ;d

LEXICON EDH_DAHKE_INFL
           +Sg+Nom:edh   FINAL1    ;
         +Cmp/SgNom:edh   R         ;
               +Sg:adahk NIEJTE_SG ;
               +Pl:adahk NIEJTE_PL ;
                  :adahk EVEN_ESS  ;             
!+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:e%»tj GÅATETJE  ;
 

LEXICON VUELIE ! adverbleksikon
         :vuel   N_IE         ;
         :vuelie EVENCOMPONLY ;
         :vööle  MES          ;

LEXICON GAEDTIE ! adverbleksikon   - adverb og adjektiv kan kompareres
         :gaedt    N_IE    ;
         :gaedtieg ODDCOMP ;

LEXICON JILLIE ! adverb  - adverb og adjektiv kan kompareres- men adjektiv -//- adverb?
!+A: N_IE_FORMS ;
!    EVENCOMP ;
             N_IE     ;
         :ie EVENCOMP ;
 
 
 LEXICON BERN_NOUN
    CNAME_EVENLEX ;
  
  
! ## Px lexica     = Copy from Julev
!
!LEXICON NPxV
! @R.Px.add@ PxV ;
!
!LEXICON NPxV-12
! @R.Px.add@ PxV-12 ;
!
!LEXICON NPxV3
! @R.Px.add@ PxV3 ;
! 
!LEXICON NPxNomPlV
! @R.Px.add@ PxNomPlV ;
! 
!LEXICON NPxCi
! @R.Px.add@ PxCi ;
! 
!LEXICON NPxC
! @R.Px.add@ PxC ;
! 
!LEXICON NPxCs
! @R.Px.add@ PxCs ;
! 
!LEXICON NPxCc
! @R.Px.add@ PxCc ;





 
 
 
