src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx
aids+N+Sem/Dummytag:aids BERN_NOUN ; ! preliminary. check
gaedtie+N+Sem/Plc_Wthr: GAEDTIE ;
jillie+N+Sem/Ani:jill JILLIE ; !jillebe, jillemes
mail+N+Sem/Dummytag:mail BERN_NOUN ; ! preliminary. check
minngie+N+Sem/Dummytag:minng JILLIE ;
vuelie+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Prod-audio: VUELIE ;
workshop+N+Sem/Event:workshop BERN_NOUN ;
input+N+Sem/Dummytag:input BERN_NOUN ;
output+N+Sem/Dummytag:output BERN_NOUN ;
